Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 2

Changes in Boundaries—New Counties

5-2-101. New counties — General requirements.

New counties may be established by the general assembly that consist of not less than two hundred seventy-five square miles (275 sq. mi.), and that shall contain a population of not less than seven hundred (700) qualified voters.

No line of such county shall approach the courthouse of any old county from which it may be taken nearer than eleven (11) miles, nor shall such old county be reduced to less than five hundred square miles (500 sq. mi.).

No part of a county shall be taken off to form a new county or a part thereof without the consent of two thirds (2/3) of the qualified voters in such part taken off; and where an old county is reduced for the purpose of forming a new one, the seat of justice in the old county shall not be removed without the concurrence of two thirds (2/3) of both branches of the general assembly.

Code 1858, § 82 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 10, § 4); Shan., § 100 (as mod. by Const. 1870, art. 10, § 4); Code 1932, § 117; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-201.

Cross-References. Establishment of new counties, Tenn. Const., art. X, § 4.

Removal of county seat, title 5, ch. 4.

Transfer of assessments from old county, § 67-5-512.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 4.

5-2-102. New counties — Notice of petition for creation.

When it is intended to petition the general assembly to create a new county, notice of such intention shall be posted on meeting days of the county legislative bodies, at least sixty (60) days next preceding the annual election of representatives to the general assembly, at the front doors of the courthouses of the counties from which the new county is proposed to be formed, which notice shall set forth the names of such counties, and the metes and bounds proposed for the new county.

Code 1858, § 83 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 112); Shan., § 101; Code 1932, § 120; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-202.

5-2-103. Memorial for division of county.

Any person desiring to divide a county shall prefer a memorial to the general assembly for that purpose.

The memorial shall describe the line or lines of the proposed division and be accompanied by a fair and accurate plat of the county to be divided, representing together the old counties and the new one, the survey and plat to be made by a sworn surveyor, and by such surveyor subscribed and certified to be just and true.

Code 1858, §§ 88, 89 (deriv. Acts 1796 (March S.), ch. 13, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 110, 111; Code 1932, §§ 129, 130; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-203.

5-2-104. Boundary changes — Plats and surveys.

All applications for legislation changing county lines shall be accompanied by:

An accurate survey and plat, showing the changes asked for, and giving courses and distances of the county line as it will be left after such change should be made; and

A resolution approved by two thirds (2/3) of the county commissioners of all counties affected by such boundary line change.

No bill providing for such change shall be in order unless so accompanied.

Acts 1895, ch. 105, § 1; Shan., § 93; Code 1932, § 111; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-204; Acts 1999, ch. 331, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 399, §§ 1 and 2, effective January 1, 2014, provided that the boundary lines between Davidson County and Wilson County shall be revised so as to include within Wilson County all of the territory described in the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 8.

Attorney General Opinions. Process and effect of altering boundaries between existing counties, OAG 98-035, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (2/9/98).

Constitutionality and enforcement of legislative procedures for changing county lines, OAG 99-101, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (5/5/99).

Constitutional permissibility of property transfer between Davidson and Wilson counties. OAG 13-08, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (2/1/13).

Collateral References.

Challenging acts or proceedings by which its boundaries are affected, right of county as to. 86 A.L.R. 1373.

5-2-105. Transferred areas — Continuing liability.

The fractions taken from old counties to form new counties, or taken from one (1) county and added to another shall continue to be liable for their pro rata of all debts contracted by their respective counties prior to the separation, and be entitled to their proportion of any stocks or credits belonging to such old counties.

Const. 1870, art. 10, § 4; Shan., § 100a1; Code 1932, § 118; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Process and effect of altering boundaries between existing counties, OAG 98-035, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (2/9/98).

5-2-106. Transferred areas — Voting rights.

The registered voters who may be included in any new county shall vote with the county or counties from which they may have been stricken off, for members of congress, for governor and for members of the general assembly until the next apportionment of members to the general assembly after the establishment of such new county.

Const. 1870, art. 10, § 5; Shan., § 100a2; mod. Code 1932, § 119; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-206.

Attorney General Opinions. Process and effect of altering boundaries between existing counties, OAG 98-035, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (2/9/98).

5-2-107. Transcription of records.

The county legislative bodies of new counties so formed may appoint a commissioner or commissioners to transcribe the records of all title deeds to lands and mortgages and other pertinent instruments affecting lands lying in the new counties, and when the transcript is completed, the register of the county from which the same is taken shall affix such register's certificate to the transcript, and the same shall be filed with the register of the new county, and a copy from the transcript shall be as valid evidence of title in all courts of law and equity in this state as the original would be; provided, that the expenses of the transcript shall be paid by the county or counties for whose benefit the same is made.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 112, § 2; Shan., § 109; Code 1932, § 128; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-207.

5-2-108. New or altered counties — Pending litigation.

All actions at law or in equity, or causes in the court of general sessions of any old county where new counties have been formed from the territory of the same, if the parties interested in the suits live in the new counties so formed, and the subject matter of the suits originated within the limits of the new county, upon application of the parties litigant, or either of them, may be removed to the new county.

When the plaintiff and defendant in any litigation both reside in a new county established by law, the litigation, if pending in one (1) of the old counties from which the new county is taken, may be transferred to the court established for the new county, either common law, chancery, or criminal, according to the nature of the case.

Code 1858, § 84 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 86, § 1); Acts 1870-1871, ch. 112, § 1; Shan., §§ 102, 108; Code 1932, §§ 121, 127; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 5-208, 5-209, 5-2-109.

Cross-References. Dissolution of new counties, pending litigation, § 5-2-112.

5-2-109. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-2-109 (Code 1858, § 84 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 86, § 1); Shan., § 102; Code 1932, § 121; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-209) was transferred in 1985 to § 5-2-108.

5-2-110. Transfer of court records.

In all cases where new counties are formed out of fractions of old counties, or where fractions of one county are attached to another county, it shall be the duty of the judge or judges of the court of general sessions of the old county, or of the county from which the fraction is taken, to deliver all the dockets, papers, public laws and statutes belonging to that judge's office to the nearest judge of the new county, or of the county to which the fraction is attached, and the judges to which the dockets, etc., are delivered, shall have the same authority over the dockets, etc., and the judgments thereon, as is by law conferred on the judge rendering such judgment.

Acts 1873, ch. 114, § 1; Shan., § 105; Code 1932, § 124; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-210.

5-2-111. Process on transferred records.

Where the docket shall have been delivered as provided in § 5-2-110, it shall be the duty of the magistrate of the new county to issue executions, scire facias, and such other process as may be necessary for the enforcement of the judgments thereon, to the same extent and in as full a manner as the magistrate of the old county could have done, and it shall be the duty of the county clerk of the new county, upon presentation of any such process, to certify to the official character of the magistrate issuing the execution or other process, and any such process so certified shall have the same force and validity in any other county as is now by law given to such process when issued by a magistrate of an old county and certified by the clerk thereof.

Acts 1873, ch. 114, § 2; Shan., § 106; Code 1932, § 125; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-211.

5-2-112. Dissolution of new county — Pending litigation.

When a new county that has been established by act of the general assembly and that has gone into operation is subsequently dissolved in any way or for any reason, the pending litigation in the courts and before the judges of the court of general sessions of that county shall not abate, but shall be transferred to the courts and judges of the old county from which the new county was formed.

The suits before judges of the court of general sessions, in such cases, will follow the place where the judge holds such judge's court.

Suits in court shall be transferred to the county in which the defendant resides, if the defendant resides in either of the old counties from which the new county was taken, and, if not, to the old county selected by the plaintiff.

Code 1858, §§ 85, 86; Shan., §§ 103, 104; Code 1932, §§ 122, 123; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-212.

Cross-References. New or altered counties, pending litigation, § 5-2-108.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 610.

5-2-113. Dissolution of new county — Fiduciaries.

The executors, administrators and guardians appointed in such dissolved counties, who have not settled and closed their trusts, shall make settlements in the court of general sessions of the county that would have had jurisdiction if such new county had never been organized; and such persons may be proceeded against as if appointed in the old county.

Code 1858, § 87 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 28, § 1); Shan., § 107; Code 1932, § 126; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-213.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 610.

5-2-114. Location of boundaries — Authority of state board of equalization.

The state board of equalization shall have jurisdiction to determine the location of county boundaries.

Acts 1972, ch. 622, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-214.

Cross-References. Exceptions, §§ 5-2-115, 5-2-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 8.

5-2-115. Location of boundaries — Assessment of property — Effects of county boundary changes — Notification.

In circumstances where property is claimed to be located within the boundaries of two (2) adjoining counties and the property has been assessed for property taxation by both counties, the location of county boundaries shall be determined by the state board of equalization.

If the state board determines that the entire property lies within either of the respective counties, it shall declare the assessment made by the other county void.

Upon a determination by the state board that the property is partially located within the boundaries of both counties, it shall determine the number of acres or amount of property lying within each of the respective counties and determine the pro rata value of the property lying within each of the counties and assess the same pursuant to § 67-5-505.

When property has been assessed in one county for five (5) years or more, the state board shall not have authority to rule that such property shall be located in a different county, but the board shall have authority to redress double assessment in these circumstances by voiding the later assessment to the extent it represents an assessment by both counties.

Acts 1972, ch. 622, § 2; 1975, ch. 156, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-215; Acts 2000, ch. 622, § 1; 2010, ch. 739, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 622, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to the tax year next following the adjustment of the records of the state board.

Cross-References. Use of property maps, § 67-5-806.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 8.

5-2-116. Location of boundaries — Purposes other than assessment.

In circumstances where a dispute arises concerning the location of a county line for purposes other than property taxation, the state board of equalization shall have authority to determine the location of county lines.

In such disputes, the state board shall not have the authority to locate a county line so that property that has been assessed for property taxation purposes in one (1) county for five (5) years or more is located in a different county.

Acts 1972, ch. 622, § 3; 1975, ch. 156, § 2; T.C.A., § 5-216.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 8.

5-2-117. Location of boundaries — Effect of determination.

Any determination of the state board of equalization regarding the location of county boundaries shall be final and conclusive subject to judicial review.

Acts 1972, ch. 622, § 4; T.C.A., § 5-217.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 8.